Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-126
Drainage improvements; bonds; issuance; notice.

In the event of a county board determining to issue bonds, it shall give notice by publication once each week for three weeks of the proposed issue of bonds, and the amount thereof, at any time within sixty days after the date of the first publication of such notice.

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 21, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 1743;

C.S.1922, § 1690;

C.S.1929, § 31-126;

R.S.1943, § 31-126.